Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 4. Amendment and Restatement of Articles.

Sec. 10.50.100.
Amendment of articles.

A limited liability company may amend its articles of organization in any respect if the articles as amended contain only the provisions that are required or permitted by this chapter to be included in the original articles of organization at the time of the amendment.

A limited liability company may amend its articles of organization by filing articles of amendment with the department. The articles of amendment must state the

name of the company;

date the articles of organization were filed; and

amendment adopted by the company.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.105.
Restatement of articles.

A limited liability company may restate its articles of organization at any time. The company shall file its restated articles with the department. The restated articles of organization must be specifically designated as restated articles in the title to the restated articles and must state, either in the title or in an introductory paragraph, the

company’s present and, if the name is changed, all of the company’s former names; and

date of the filing of the company’s original articles of organization.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)